Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 8 CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN
25.5-8-109.3. Health services initiatives.

To the extent federal financial participation is available, the department shall design and implement health service initiatives pursuant to section 2105(a)(1)(D)(ii) of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, to provide funding for continuous enrollment for the twelve-month postpartum period for a person who is enrolled in health-care coverage pursuant to section 25.5-5-201 (6) or 25.5-8-109 (7).

To the extent additional federal financial participation is available, the department shall establish a stakeholder process in collaboration with department staff to determine additional priorities and budget allocations that draw down at least fifty percent of the remaining health services initiative funds to expand access to perinatal and postpartum supports. The department shall report on the established priorities and budget allocations and the ways in which they are inclusive of stakeholder input during the department's 2024 presentation to the joint budget committee of the general assembly and in the department's presentation to the health and human services committee of the senate and the health and insurance committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees, at the hearing held pursuant to section 2-7-203 (2)(a) of the "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act". In conducting the stakeholder process, the department shall:

Engage directly with impacted individuals, service providers, advocacy organizations, and individuals working in or representing communities who are diverse with regard to race, ethnicity, immigration status, age, ability, sexual orientation, gender identity, or geographic region of the state and who are affected by higher rates of health disparities and inequities;

Publicize, conduct, and report outcomes of stakeholder meetings in, at a minimum, English and Spanish;

Include opportunities for participation in the stakeholder process outside of regular work hours;

Conduct a minimum of five stakeholder meetings and conduct additional meetings focused on hearing input from individual constituencies listed in subsection (2)(a) of this section;

Take into consideration research and information from reports issued by the maternal mortality review committee, as required by section 25-52-104 (6);

Take into consideration data from the health survey for birthing parents to inform stakeholder decision-making; and

Consider initiatives to reduce diaper need, expand access to group-based prenatal and pediatric care models, and expand home visitation programs, including voluntary newborn nurse visitation programs that are universally offered to all families in a given community and provide at least one nurse visit within the first three months of life.

The department shall seek any necessary federal approvals to obtain federal financial participation in implementing subsection (1) of this section.

To the extent allowable, the department shall maximize federal financial participation in implementing this section.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2847, § 23, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-8-109.5. Telehealth - interim therapeutic restorations - reimbursement - definitions.

Subject to federal authorization and financial participation, on or after July 1, 2016, in-person contact between a health-care provider and an enrollee is not required under the children's basic health plan for the diagnosis, development of a treatment plan, instruction to perform an interim therapeutic restoration procedure, or supervision of a dental hygienist performing an interim therapeutic restoration procedure. A health-care provider may provide these services through telehealth, including store-and-forward transfer, and is entitled to reimbursement for the delivery of those services via telehealth to the extent the services are otherwise eligible for reimbursement under the plan. The services are subject to the reimbursement policies developed pursuant to the children's basic health plan.

As used in this section:

"Interim therapeutic restoration" has the same meaning as set forth in section 12-220-104 (10).

"Store-and-forward transfer" means the asynchronous transmission of medical or dental information to be reviewed by a dentist at a later time at a distant site without the patient present in real time.

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (HB 15-1309), ch. 326, p. 1335, § 9, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1711, § 191, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 21-102), ch. 31, p. 130, § 11, effective September 1.

25.5-8-110. Participation by managed care plans.

Managed care plans, as defined in section 10-16-102 (43), C.R.S., that participate in the plan shall do so by contract with the department and shall provide the health-care services covered by the plan to each enrollee.

Managed care plans participating in the plan shall not discriminate against any potential or current enrollee based upon health status, disability, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, marital status, race, creed, color, national origin, ancestry, ethnicity, or religion.

Managed care plans that contract with the department to provide the plan to enrollees shall also be willing to contract with the medicaid managed care program, as administered by the department.

Managed care plans shall be selected by the department to participate in the children's basic health plan based upon the managed care plans' assurances and the department's verification that the managed care plan is utilizing within its network essential community providers to the extent that this action does not result in a net increase in the cost for providing services to the managed care plan.

The managed care organization shall seek proposals from each essential community provider in a county in which the managed care organization is enrolling recipients for those services that the managed care organization provides or intends to provide and that an essential community provider provides or is capable of providing. To assist managed care organizations in seeking proposals, the department shall provide managed care organizations with a list of essential community providers in each county. The managed care organization shall consider such proposals in good faith and shall, when deemed reasonable by the managed care organization based on the needs of its enrollees, contract with essential community providers. Each essential community provider shall be willing to negotiate on reasonably equitable terms with each managed care organization. Essential community providers making proposals under this subsection (4) shall be able to meet the contractual requirements of the managed care organization. The requirement of this subsection (4) shall not apply to a managed care organization in areas in which the managed care organization operates entirely as a group model health maintenance organization.

Any disputes between a managed care organization and an essential community provider that cannot be resolved through good faith negotiations may be resolved through an informal review by the department at the request of one of the parties, or through the department's aggrieved provider appeal process in accordance with section 25.5-1-107 (2), if requested by one of the parties.

In selecting managed care organizations through competitive bidding, the department shall give preference to those managed care organizations that have executed contracts for services with one or more essential community providers. In selecting managed care organizations, the department shall not penalize a managed care organization for paying cost-based reimbursement to federally qualified health centers as defined in the federal "Social Security Act".

The department may receive and act upon complaints from enrollees regarding failure to provide covered services or efforts to obtain payment, other than authorized copayments, for covered services directly from eligible recipients.

Parents or guardians of children shall choose a participating health maintenance organization before enrolling in the plan in areas of the state where a participating health maintenance organization is available. The department will assign children who are currently enrolled in the plan and whose parents or guardians have not selected a health maintenance organization within a time period determined by the department to a participating health maintenance organization with the child's primary care physician in the network. The department shall seek to maintain continuity of the health plan between medicaid and the children's basic health plan.

In areas of the state in which a participating managed care plan does not have providers, the department may contract with essential community providers and other health-care providers to provide health-care services under the children's basic health plan using a managed care model.

The department may contract with essential community providers or other providers or develop other administrative arrangements to provide health-care services under the children's basic health plan to enrollees prior to the effective date of enrollment in the selected managed care plan.

The department shall allow, at least annually, an opportunity for enrollees to transfer among participating managed care plans serving their respective geographic regions. The department shall establish a period of at least twenty days annually when this opportunity is afforded eligible recipients. In geographic regions served by more than one participating managed care plan, the department shall endeavor to establish a uniform period for such opportunity.

The department shall make a capitation payment to managed care plans based upon a defined scope of services at an agreed upon rate. The department shall only use market rate bids that do not discriminate and are adequate to assure quality, network sufficiency, and long-term competitiveness in the children's basic health plan managed care market. The department shall retain a qualified actuary to establish a lower limit for such bids. A certification by such actuary to the appropriate lower limit shall be conclusive evidence of the department's compliance with the requirements of this subsection (10). For the purposes of this subsection (10), a "qualified actuary" shall be a person deemed as such under rules promulgated by the commissioner of insurance.

Repealed.

All managed care plans participating in the plan shall meet standards regarding the quality of services to be provided, financial integrity, and responsiveness to the unmet health-care needs of eligible persons that may be served.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1982, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1603, § 32, effective May 29.

L. 2009:

(10) amended, (SB 09-265), ch. 205, p. 936, § 7, effective May 1.

L. 2010:

(10)(b) repealed, (HB 10-1382), ch. 217, p. 940, § 6, effective May 6.

L. 2013:

(1) amended, (HB 13-1266), ch. 217, p. 993, § 65, effective May 13.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 897, § 41, effective September 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-110 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 341, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.

(2) For the definition of "federally qualified health centers" in the federal Social Security Act, see 42 U.S.C. sec. 1395x.

(3) For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

25.5-8-111. Department - administration - outsourcing.

The department may:

Pursuant to section 24-50-504 (2)(a), C.R.S., enter into personal services contracts for the administration of the children's basic health plan. Any contracts established pursuant to this section shall contain performance measures that shall be monitored by the department.

Use county departments of human or social services to perform functions relating to the administration of the children's basic health plan;

Perform administrative functions at the department, including consolidation of functions with other administrative functions handled by the department.

In deciding how to allocate functions relating to the administration of the children's basic health plan as allowed under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the department shall determine and base its decisions upon what is the most cost-effective method to handle the particular function and to deliver the services.

The implementation of subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section is contingent upon a finding by the state personnel director that any of the conditions of section 24-50-504 (2), C.R.S., have been met or that the conditions of section 24-50-503 (1), C.R.S., have been met.

If the state department uses county departments of human or social services to perform functions relating to the administration of the children's basic health plan pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section and allocates money to a county for that purpose, the state department shall make the allocation in accordance with the results of the public assistance programs funding model described in section 26-1-121.5.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1984, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(II) amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 446, § 113, effective August 8.

L. 2022:

(3) added, (SB 22-235), ch. 409, p. 2895, § 4, effective June 7.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-111 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-8-112. Authority to the department to apply for federal waivers.

The department is hereby authorized and required to apply for any federal waivers necessary to implement the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1985, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-19-112 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-8-113. Reports by contractors to medical services board. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1985, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section repealed, (HB 16-1081), ch. 22, p. 52, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section was similar to former § 26-19-113 as it existed prior to 2006.